District of Columbia statutes.
6-751.07

Permits.

No owner may permanently wire a smoke detector to the electrical system of a structure without first obtaining an electrical permit from the Permit Division of the Department of Licenses, Investigation and Inspections.

History

June 20, 1978, D.C. Law 2-81, § 8, 24 DCR 9050

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-535.
1973 Ed., § 5-334.